Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3D-107] Contents of own risk and solvency
assessment summary report. (a) The own risk and solvency assessment
summary report shall be prepared consistent with the Own Risk and Solvency Assessment
Guidance Manual and subject to the requirements of subsection (b). Documentation
and supporting information shall be maintained and made available upon examination
or upon request of the commissioner.

(b) The review of the own risk and solvency
assessment summary report and any additional requests for information shall be made
using similar procedures currently used in the analysis and examination of multi-state
or global insurers and insurance groups. [L 2016, c 140, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next